Colorado, session 2026A, HB1316.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, add 38-30-170.5 as
follows:
38-30-170.5. Private club membership covenants void and
unenforceable - disclosure related to private club budget and
operations required - compliance - definitions.
(1) AS USED IN THIS SECTION, UNLESS THE CONTEXT OTHERWISE
REQUIRES:
(a) "COVENANT" MEANS A RECORDED INSTRUMENT BETWEEN
OWNERS OF REAL PROPERTY THAT IMPOSES MUTUAL RESTRICTIONS OR
REQUIREMENTS ON THE OWNERS OF REAL PROPERTY FOR THE BENEFIT OF
ALL OWNERS AND RESIDENTS WITHIN A COMMUNITY.
(b) "DECLARATION" HAS THE MEANING SET FORTH IN SECTION
38-33.3-103 (13).
(c) (I) "PRIVATE MEMBERSHIP CLUB" OR "CLUB" MEANS AN
ORGANIZATION, A BUSINESS ENTITY, A CORPORATION, A NONPROFIT
ASSOCIATION, OR ANOTHER ENTITY THAT:
(A) ADMITS MEMBERS AND REQUIRES MEMBERS TO PAY
MONETARY DUES, ASSESSMENTS, OR FEES IN EXCHANGE FOR ACCESS TO
CLUB FACILITIES, PROGRAMS, OR SERVICES; AND
(B) IS PRIVATELY OWNED OR OPERATED.
(II) "PRIVATE MEMBERSHIP CLUB" INCLUDES A COUNTRY CLUB, A
SPORTS AND RECREATION CLUB, A GOLF CLUB, A TENNIS CLUB, AND AN
EQUESTRIAN CLUB.
(III) "PRIVATE MEMBERSHIP CLUB" DOES NOT INCLUDE:
(A) A UNIT OWNERS' ASSOCIATION ORGANIZED PURSUANT TO
-2- HB26-1316

SECTION 38-33.3-301;
(B) A METROPOLITAN DISTRICT, AS DEFINED BY SECTION 32-1-103
(10); OR
(C) A RECREATIONAL CLUB, AMENITY, OR FACILITY THAT IS
OWNED OR OPERATED BY A METROPOLITAN DISTRICT, A UNIT OWNERS'
ASSOCIATION, OR OTHER COMMON INTEREST COMMUNITY, AS DEFINED BY
SECTION 38-33.3-103 (8).
(2) A COVENANT OR DECLARATION FOR A RESIDENTIAL PROPERTY
THAT IS RECORDED ON OR AFTER JANUARY 1, 2027, AND THAT REQUIRES
THE OWNER OF THE RESIDENTIAL PROPERTY TO JOIN A PRIVATE
MEMBERSHIP CLUB IS VOID AND UNENFORCEABLE.
(3) A PRIVATE MEMBERSHIP CLUB THAT COLLECTS DUES OR FEES
FROM AN OWNER OF A RESIDENTIAL PROPERTY, WHICH RESIDENTIAL
PROPERTY IS SUBJECT TO A COVENANT OR DECLARATION THAT REQUIRES
THE PROPERTY OWNER TO PAY DUES OR FEES TO THE CLUB, SHALL MAKE
THE FOLLOWING INFORMATION AVAILABLE IN ACCORDANCE WITH
SUBSECTION (4) OF THIS SECTION:
(a) THE AMOUNT OF DUES OR FEES THAT THE PRIVATE MEMBERSHIP
CLUB ANTICIPATES COLLECTING FROM PROPERTY OWNERS IN THE CLUB'S
CURRENT FISCAL YEAR, INCLUDING A TOTAL AMOUNT OF FEES AND A
CALCULATION OF THE AMOUNT OF FEES COLLECTED PER PROPERTY OWNER;
(b) THE ACTUAL AMOUNT OF DUES OR FEES COLLECTED BY THE
PRIVATE MEMBERSHIP CLUB FROM PROPERTY OWNERS IN THE CLUB'S PRIOR
FISCAL YEAR;
(c) THE DATE ON WHICH THE CLUB'S FISCAL YEAR COMMENCES;
(d) THE CLUB'S OPERATING BUDGET FOR THE CURRENT FISCAL
YEAR;
-3- HB26-1316

(e) A LIST, BY TYPE, OF THE CLUB'S CURRENT ASSESSMENTS,
INCLUDING BOTH REGULAR AND SPECIAL ASSESSMENTS;
(f) THE CLUB'S ANNUAL FINANCIAL STATEMENTS, INCLUDING ANY
AMOUNTS HELD IN RESERVE FROM THE PRIOR FISCAL YEAR;
(g) A LIST OF ALL CLUB INSURANCE POLICIES, INCLUDING, BUT NOT
LIMITED TO, PROPERTY INSURANCE, GENERAL LIABILITY, PROFESSIONAL
LIABILITY, AND FIDELITY POLICIES. THE LIST SHALL INCLUDE THE
COMPANY NAMES, POLICY LIMITS, POLICY DEDUCTIBLES, ADDITIONAL
NAMED INSUREDS, AND EXPIRATION DATES OF THE POLICIES LISTED.
(h) ANY RELEVANT BYLAWS, ARTICLES, AND RULES OF THE CLUB;
AND
(i) THE MINUTES OF THE EXECUTIVE BOARD AND MEMBER
MEETINGS FROM THE PRIOR FISCAL YEAR.
(4) (a) A PRIVATE MEMBERSHIP CLUB SHALL MAKE THE
INFORMATION DESCRIBED IN SUBSECTION (3) OF THIS SECTION AVAILABLE
BY:
(I) POSTING THE INFORMATION IN A CONSPICUOUS MANNER ON THE
PRIVATE MEMBERSHIP CLUB'S PUBLIC WEBSITE AND SENDING AN
ACCOMPANYING NOTICE OF THAT WEBSITE ADDRESS TO EACH PROPERTY
OWNER THAT PAYS DUES OR FEES TO THE PRIVATE MEMBERSHIP CLUB VIA
FIRST CLASS MAIL OR EMAIL; AND
(II) MAILING OR PERSONALLY DELIVERING THE INFORMATION TO
EACH PROPERTY OWNER THAT PAYS DUES OR FEES TO THE PRIVATE
MEMBERSHIP CLUB.
(b) A PRIVATE MEMBERSHIP CLUB SHALL MAKE THE INFORMATION
DESCRIBED IN SUBSECTION (3) OF THIS SECTION AVAILABLE AT NO COST TO
THE PROPERTY OWNERS.
-4- HB26-1316

(c) A PRIVATE MEMBERSHIP CLUB SHALL MAKE THE INFORMATION
DESCRIBED IN SUBSECTION (3) OF THIS SECTION AVAILABLE TO PROPERTY
OWNERS WITHIN NINETY DAYS AFTER THE END OF THE PRIVATE
MEMBERSHIP CLUB'S FISCAL YEAR AND PROVIDE UPDATED INFORMATION
EACH FISCAL YEAR THEREAFTER.
(5) (a) IF A PRIVATE MEMBERSHIP CLUB DOES NOT MAKE THE
INFORMATION DESCRIBED IN SUBSECTION (3) OF THIS SECTION AVAILABLE
OR OTHERWISE VIOLATES THIS SECTION, ANY COVENANT THAT REQUIRES
A PROPERTY OWNER TO PAY DUES OR FEES TO THE PRIVATE MEMBERSHIP
CLUB IS VOID AND UNENFORCEABLE UNTIL THE PRIVATE MEMBERSHIP
CLUB MAKES THE INFORMATION DESCRIBED IN SUBSECTION (3) AVAILABLE
IN ACCORDANCE WITH SUBSECTION (4) OF THIS SECTION.
(b) (I) IF A PRIVATE MEMBERSHIP CLUB IS NOT IN COMPLIANCE
WITH THIS SECTION, A PROPERTY OWNER IS NOT REQUIRED TO PAY ANY
DUES OR FEES TO THE PRIVATE MEMBERSHIP CLUB AND MAY BRING A CIVIL
CLAIM FOR RELIEF AGAINST THE PRIVATE MEMBERSHIP CLUB.
(II) A PROPERTY OWNER THAT PREVAILS IN A CIVIL CLAIM AGAINST
A PRIVATE MEMBERSHIP CLUB PURSUANT TO THIS SECTION MAY BE
AWARDED ACTUAL DAMAGES, PUNITIVE DAMAGES, AND ATTORNEY FEES.
SECTION 2. Act subject to petition - effective date. This act
takes effect at 12:01 a.m. on the day following the expiration of the
ninety-day period after final adjournment of the general assembly (August
12, 2026, if adjournment sine die is on May 13, 2026); except that, if a
referendum petition is filed pursuant to section 1 (3) of article V of the
state constitution against this act or an item, section, or part of this act
within such period, then the act, item, section, or part will not take effect
unless approved by the people at the general election to be held in
-5- HB26-1316

November 2026 and, in such case, will take effect on the date of the
official declaration of the vote thereon by the governor.
-6- HB26-1316